Hawaii, session 2026, GM1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the presence of lead
in drinking water has serious negative effects on human health.
Nationally, there has been a heightened focus on decreasing lead
exposure, particularly in drinking water. The legislature
further finds that to enhance public health protection, it is
necessary for the State to align its lead use regulations with
the more restrictive corresponding federal regulations.
The purpose of this Act is to strengthen restrictions on
lead use in drinking water by amending chapter 340E, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, to align with federal lead use prohibitions as
adopted in title. 40 Code of Federal Regulations sections 143.12
and 143.13.
SECTION 2. Section 340E-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (i) to read as follows:
"(i) No person shall install or repair any public water
system or any plumbing in a residential or nonresidential
facility providing water for human consumption [whieh] that is
2026-2488 SB3136 CDl SMA.docx
niiniiiiiiiiMiiMiiMiDiiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO. g;
connected to a public water system with any pipe, solder, flux,
pipe fittings, plumbing fittings, or fixtures that are not lead
free. "Lead free"^ with respect to [eelder^] solder and flux^
means containing not more than 0.2 per cent lead, and with
respect to wetted surfaces of pipes pipe fittings^
plumbing fittings, and fixtures, means containing not more than
[8.0 per-cent loud and with reopoot to plumbing-fittings-and
fixtures- means those -in compMunce -with Nationa-3r Sanitudion
Foundation-Standard 61,—scetien -9. ] a weighted average of 0.25
per cent lead, as calculated in accordance with title 40 Code of
Federal Regulations section 143.12(b) through (f). This
subsection shall not apply to [ loaded]
(1) Leaded joints necessary for the repair of cast iron
pipes [-7-12,
(2) Pipes, pipe fittings, plumbing fittings, or fixtures,
including backflow preventers, that are used
exclusively for nonpotable service such as
manufacturing, industrial processing, irrigation,
outdoor watering, or any other uses where the water is
not anticipated to be used for human consumption;
2026-2488 SB3136 CDl SMA.docx 2
nimiiiHiniiiiMHi

Page 3
S.B. NO. ’“
h
(3) Toilets, bidets, urinals, fill valves, flushometer
valves, tub fillers, shower valves, fire hydrants,
service saddles, or water distribution main gate
valves that are two inches in diameter or larger; or
(4) Clothes washing machines, emergency drench showers,
emergency face wash equipment, eyewash devices, fire
suppression sprinklers, steam-capable clothes dryers,
and sump pumps."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2488 SB3136 CDl SMA.docx 3
HllllillHIIIilllllilHHIBI

S.B. NO.
^1
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B.No. 3136, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
'resident of thePSfenatte
Clerk of the Senate
59-26

SB No. 3136, HD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives